Washington statutes.
RCW 43.62.040

Assistance to office of financial management—Determination by office of financial management conclusive.

The department of revenue or any other state officer or officials of cities, towns, or counties shall upon request of the office of financial management furnish such information, aid, and assistance as may be required by the office of financial management in the performance of its population studies. The action of the office of financial management in determining the population shall be final and conclusive.

[ 1979 c 151 s 130; 1975 1st ex.s. c 278 s 25; 1965 c 8 s 43.62.040. Prior: 1957 c 175 s 4; 1951 c 96 s 3.]

NOTES:

Construction—Severability—1975 1st ex.s. c 278: See notes following RCW 11.08.160.